Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 4.1-204.
(Effective until July 1, 2024) Records of licensees; inspection of records and places of business.

Manufacturers, bottlers or wholesalers. — Every licensed manufacturer, bottler or wholesaler shall keep complete, accurate and separate records in accordance with Board regulations of all alcoholic beverages purchased, manufactured, bottled, sold or shipped by him, and the applicable tax required by §

4.1-234

or

4.1-236

, if any.

Retailers. — Every retail licensee shall keep complete, accurate, and separate records, in accordance with Board regulations, of all purchases of alcoholic beverages, the prices charged such licensee therefor, and the names and addresses of the persons from whom purchased. Every retail licensee shall also preserve all invoices showing his purchases for a period as specified by Board regulations. He shall also keep an accurate account of daily sales, showing quantities of alcoholic beverages sold and the total price charged by him therefor. Except as otherwise provided in subsection D, such account need not give the names or addresses of the purchasers thereof, except as may be required by Board regulation for the sale of alcoholic beverages in kegs. In the case of persons holding retail licenses that require sales of food to determine their qualifications for such licenses, the records shall also include purchases and sales of food and nonalcoholic beverages.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection F, electronic records of retail licensees may be stored off site, provided that such records are readily retrievable and available for electronic inspection by the Board or its special agents at the licensed premises. However, in the case that such electronic records are not readily available for electronic inspection on the licensed premises, the retail licensee may obtain Board approval, for good cause shown, to permit the retail licensee to provide the records to a special agent of the Board within three business days or less, as determined by the Board, after a request is made to inspect the records.

Common carriers. — Common carriers of passengers by train, boat, bus, or airplane shall keep records of purchases and sales of alcoholic beverages and food as required by Board regulation.

Wine and beer shippers. — Every wine and beer shipper licensee shall keep complete, accurate, and separate records in accordance with Board regulations of all shipments of wine or beer to persons in the Commonwealth. Such licensees shall also remit on a monthly basis an accurate account stating whether any wine, farm wine, or beer products were sold and shipped and, if so, stating the total quantities of wine and beer sold and the total price charged for such wine and beer. Such records shall include the names and addresses of the purchasers to whom the wine and beer is shipped.

Deliveries. — Every licensee or permittee that is authorized to make deliveries pursuant to §

4.1-212.1

shall keep complete, accurate, and separate records for a period of at least two years in accordance with Board regulations of all deliveries of wine or beer to persons in the Commonwealth. Such records shall include (i) the types of wine and beer sold, (ii) the total quantities of wine and beer sold, (iii) the total price charged for such wine and beer, (iv) the name and date of birth of the person to whom the wine and beer is delivered, and (v) the address to which the wine and beer is delivered. Licensees and permittees shall remit such records on a monthly basis for any month during which the licensee or permittee makes a delivery for which the licensee or permittee is required to collect and remit excise taxes due to the Authority pursuant to subsection H of §

4.1-212.1

.

Every licensee that is authorized to make deliveries pursuant to §

4.1-212.2

shall keep complete, accurate, and separate records for a period of at least two years in accordance with Board regulations of all deliveries of alcoholic beverages to persons in the Commonwealth. Such records shall include all information prescribed by Board regulations. Licensees shall remit such records within 24 hours of a records request by the Authority; however, the licensee may obtain Board approval, for good cause shown, to permit the licensee to provide records to a special agent of the Board within three business days or less, as determined by the Board, after a request is made to inspect the records.

Inspection. — The Board and its special agents shall be allowed free access during reasonable hours to every place in the Commonwealth and to the premises of both (i) every wine and beer shipper licensee and (ii) every licensee or permittee authorized to make deliveries wherever located where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, bottled, stored, offered for sale or sold, for the purpose of examining and inspecting such place and all records, invoices and accounts therein. The Board may engage the services of alcoholic beverage control authorities in any state to assist with the inspection of the premises of a wine and beer shipper licensee, licensee or permittee authorized to make deliveries, or any applicant for such license or permit.

For purposes of a Board inspection of the records of any retail licensees, “reasonable hours” means the hours between 9 a.m. and 5 p.m.; however, if the licensee generally is not open to the public substantially during the same hours, “reasonable hours” shall mean the business hours when the licensee is open to the public. At any other time of day, if the retail licensee’s records are not available for inspection, the retailer shall provide the records to a special agent of the Board within 24 hours after a request is made to inspect the records.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-44; 1958, c. 192; 1968, c. 7, § 4-98.6; 1970, c. 784; 1988, c. 261, §§ 4-134, 4-135, 4-137; 1992, cc. 161, 220; 1993, c. 866; 2003, cc. 1029, 1030; 2007, cc. 99, 799; 2008, c. 513; 2018, c. 729; 2019, c. 706; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282; 2022, cc. 78, 79.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall convene a work group to study the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption. In conducting the study, the work group shall analyze the implementation of the provisions of this act that authorize the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption, determine whether such provisions should be implemented permanently, and identify any further statutory or regulatory modifications that should be made in the event that such provisions are made permanent. The Authority shall report its findings and recommendations to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2021.”

Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall collect data regarding the compliance of third-party delivery licensees with the provisions of this act and report such data to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2023.”

Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 4 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall monitor the implementation of the provisions of this act to identify any difficulties of third-party delivery licensees in determining locations to which alcoholic beverages may be delivered and the adequacy of applicable training and education programs. The Board of Directors of the Authority shall promulgate regulations, if necessary, to address any issues identified during such monitoring process.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 1029 and 1030 are identical, and added “Except as otherwise provided in subsection D” in the fourth sentence of subsection B; inserted present subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as present subsection E; and in subsection E, inserted “and to the premises of every wine shipper licensee and beer shipper licensee wherever located” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 99 and 799 are nearly identical, and added subsection E; and redesignated former subsection E as present subsection F and in the first sentence of subsection F, inserted “both (i)” and “and (ii) every delivery permittee” and in the last sentence, inserted “or delivery permittee” and “or permit” and made a related change. Additionally, Acts 2007, c. 799, deleted a section symbol preceding “4.1-236” in subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 513 added the last paragraph in subsection F.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 729 added the second paragraph to subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 706 rewrote subsection E, which read: “Delivery permittees. — Every holder of a delivery permit issued pursuant to §

4.1-212.1

shall keep complete, accurate, and separate records in accordance with Board regulations of all deliveries of wine or beer to persons in the Commonwealth. Such permittees shall also remit on a monthly basis an accurate account that sets forth the total quantities of wine and beer sold and the total price charged for such wine and beer. Such records shall include the names and addresses of the purchasers to whom the wine and beer is delivered. If no wine or beer was sold and delivered in any month, the permittee shall not be required to submit a report to the Board for that month; however, every permittee must submit a report to the Board no less frequently than once every 12 months even if no sales or deliveries have been made in the preceding 12 months.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subsection C, inserted “bus”; in subsection D, substituted “Wine and beer shippers. — Every wine and” for “Wine shippers and beer shippers. — Every wine shipper licensee and every”; in subsection E, substituted “Deliveries. — Every licensee or permittee that is authorized to make deliveries” for “Delivery permittees. — Every holder of a delivery permit issued”, and in the last sentence, substituted “Licensees and permittees” for “Permittees” and “subsection E” for “subsection D” and inserted “licensee or” twice; and in subsection F in the first sentence, substituted “wine” for “wine shipper licensee” in clause (i) and “every licensee or permittee authorized to make deliveries” for “every delivery permittee” in clause (ii), and in the second sentence, substituted “a wine and beer shipper licensee, licensee or permittee authorized to make deliveries” for “a wine shipper licensee, a beer shipper licensee, or delivery permittee” and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the version of the section effective until January 1, 2022, substituted “subsection G” for “subsection D” in subsection E. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 78 and 79 are identical, and rewrote subsection E, which pertains to deliveries of alcoholic beverages.

§ 4.1-204.
(Effective July 1, 2024) Records of licensees; inspection of records and places of business.

Manufacturers, bottlers or wholesalers. — Every licensed manufacturer, bottler or wholesaler shall keep complete, accurate and separate records in accordance with Board regulations of all alcoholic beverages purchased, manufactured, bottled, sold or shipped by him, and the applicable tax required by §

4.1-234

or

4.1-236

, if any.

Retailers. — Every retail licensee shall keep complete, accurate, and separate records, in accordance with Board regulations, of all purchases of alcoholic beverages, the prices charged such licensee therefor, and the names and addresses of the persons from whom purchased. Every retail licensee shall also preserve all invoices showing his purchases for a period as specified by Board regulations. He shall also keep an accurate account of daily sales, showing quantities of alcoholic beverages sold and the total price charged by him therefor. Except as otherwise provided in subsection D, such account need not give the names or addresses of the purchasers thereof, except as may be required by Board regulation for the sale of alcoholic beverages in kegs. In the case of persons holding retail licenses that require sales of food to determine their qualifications for such licenses, the records shall also include purchases and sales of food and nonalcoholic beverages.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection F, electronic records of retail licensees may be stored off site, provided that such records are readily retrievable and available for electronic inspection by the Board or its special agents at the licensed premises. However, in the case that such electronic records are not readily available for electronic inspection on the licensed premises, the retail licensee may obtain Board approval, for good cause shown, to permit the retail licensee to provide the records to a special agent of the Board within three business days or less, as determined by the Board, after a request is made to inspect the records.

Common carriers. — Common carriers of passengers by train, boat, bus, or airplane shall keep records of purchases and sales of alcoholic beverages and food as required by Board regulation.

Wine and beer shippers. — Every wine and beer shipper licensee shall keep complete, accurate, and separate records in accordance with Board regulations of all shipments of wine or beer to persons in the Commonwealth. Such licensees shall also remit on a monthly basis an accurate account stating whether any wine, farm wine, or beer products were sold and shipped and, if so, stating the total quantities of wine and beer sold and the total price charged for such wine and beer. Such records shall include the names and addresses of the purchasers to whom the wine and beer is shipped.

Deliveries. — Every licensee or permittee that is authorized to make deliveries pursuant to §

4.1-212.1

shall keep complete, accurate, and separate records for a period of at least two years in accordance with Board regulations of all deliveries of wine or beer to persons in the Commonwealth. Such records shall include (i) the types of wine and beer sold, (ii) the total quantities of wine and beer sold, (iii) the total price charged for such wine and beer, (iv) the name and date of birth of the person to whom the wine and beer is delivered, and (v) the address to which the wine and beer is delivered. Licensees and permittees shall remit such records on a monthly basis for any month during which the licensee or permittee makes a delivery for which the licensee or permittee is required to collect and remit excise taxes due to the Authority pursuant to subsection E of §

4.1-212.1

.

Every licensee that is authorized to make deliveries pursuant to §

4.1-212.2

shall keep complete, accurate, and separate records for a period of at least two years in accordance with Board regulations of all deliveries of alcoholic beverages to persons in the Commonwealth. Such records shall include all information prescribed by Board regulations. Licensees shall remit such records within 24 hours of a records request by the Authority; however, the licensee may obtain Board approval, for good cause shown, to permit the licensee to provide records to a special agent of the Board within three business days or less, as determined by the Board, after a request is made to inspect the records.

Inspection. — The Board and its special agents shall be allowed free access during reasonable hours to every place in the Commonwealth and to the premises of both (i) every wine and beer shipper licensee and (ii) every licensee or permittee authorized to make deliveries wherever located where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, bottled, stored, offered for sale or sold, for the purpose of examining and inspecting such place and all records, invoices and accounts therein. The Board may engage the services of alcoholic beverage control authorities in any state to assist with the inspection of the premises of a wine and beer shipper licensee, licensee or permittee authorized to make deliveries, or any applicant for such license or permit.

For purposes of a Board inspection of the records of any retail licensees, “reasonable hours” means the hours between 9 a.m. and 5 p.m.; however, if the licensee generally is not open to the public substantially during the same hours, “reasonable hours” shall mean the business hours when the licensee is open to the public. At any other time of day, if the retail licensee’s records are not available for inspection, the retailer shall provide the records to a special agent of the Board within 24 hours after a request is made to inspect the records.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-44; 1958, c. 192; 1968, c. 7, § 4-98.6; 1970, c. 784; 1988, c. 261, §§ 4-134, 4-135, 4-137; 1992, cc. 161, 220; 1993, c. 866; 2003, cc. 1029, 1030; 2007, cc. 99, 799; 2008, c. 513; 2018, c. 729; 2019, c. 706; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282; 2022, cc. 78, 79, 78, 79.

§ 4.1-205.
Local licenses.

In addition to the state licenses provided for in this chapter, the governing body of each county, city or town in the Commonwealth may provide by ordinance for the issuance of county, city or town licenses and to charge and collect license taxes therefor, to persons licensed by the Board to manufacture, bottle or sell alcoholic beverages within such county, city or town, except for temporary licenses authorized by §

4.1-211

. Subject to §

4.1-233.1

, the governing body of a county, city or town may classify licenses and graduate the license taxes therefor in the manner it deems proper.

No county, city, or town shall issue a local license to any person who does not hold or secure simultaneously the proper state license. If any person holds any local license without at the same time holding the proper state license, the local license, during the period when such person does not hold the proper state license, shall confer no privileges under the provisions of this subtitle.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-38; 1952, c. 535; 1970, cc. 627, 734; 1976, c. 496; 1978, c. 190; 1982, cc. 66, 527; 1984, c. 180; 1990, c. 707; 1992, c. 350; 1993, c. 866; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and substituted “§

4.1-233

.1” for “§

4.1-233

” in subsection A in the second sentence.